District of Columbia statutes.
19-1306.03

Settlor’s powers; powers of withdrawal.

(a)

While a trust is revocable, rights of the beneficiaries are subject to the control of, and the duties of the trustee are owed exclusively to, the settlor.

(b)

While a trust is not revocable, for so long as a person has a currently exercisable power of withdrawal over the entire principal of the trust, the duties of a trustee are owed exclusively to such person.

(c)

While a trust is revocable and a settlor does not have the capacity to revoke the trust, a beneficiary shall have the right to enforce the settlor’s intent to benefit the beneficiary during the settlor’s incapacity.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 603 of the Uniform Trust Code.

Editor's Notes